Utah statutes.
53A-11a-401.   Training, education, and prevention.

(1)  A school board shall include in the training of a school employee, training regarding bullying, hazing, and retaliation.

(2)  To the extent that state or federal funding is available for this purpose, school boards are encouraged to implement programs or initiatives, in addition to the training described in Subsection (1), to provide for training and education regarding, and the prevention of, bullying, hazing, and retaliation.

(3)  The programs or initiatives described in Subsection (2) may involve:

(a)  the establishment of a bullying task force; or

(b)  the involvement of school employees, students, or law enforcement.

